District of Columbia statutes.
11-743

Rules of court.

The District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall conduct its business according to the Federal Rules of Appellate Procedure unless the court prescribes or adopts modifications of those Rules.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 481, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Cross References

Rules concerning admission to bar, see § 11-2501.
Rules of court, see § 11-946.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-743.
1973 Ed., § 11-743.